Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-118.01
Special election, defined.

Special election shall mean an election other than a regularly scheduled primary or general election as specified in statute or by home rule charter.

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 12.

Special election is defined by this section. Arends v. Whitten, 172 Neb. 297, 109 N.W.2d 363 (1961).